Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1003.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Preventing Veterans' Homelessness Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Agency." The Pennsylvania Housing Finance Agency."Costs associated with the rental." The total costs of rent and utilities, per month, for a residential rental unit."Department." The Department of Military and Veterans Affairs of the Commonwealth.1234567891011121314151617 "Financial assistance." The rental voucher established under section 5(a)."Homeless veteran." A veteran identified and determined by the department to be homeless or at imminent risk of becoming homeless according to guidelines established by the department."Housing ombudsman." An individual designated by the agency to carry out the duties and responsibilities under section 3(c)(1)."Program." The Veterans' Housing Assistance Program established under section 3."Veteran." An individual who served on active duty in the United States Armed Forces, including any of the following:(1) A reservist or member of the National Guard who was discharged or released from the service under honorable conditions.(2) A reservist or member of the National Guard who completed an initial term of enlistment or qualifying period of service.(3) A reservist or member of the National Guard who was disabled in the line of duty during training.Section 3. Veterans' Housing Assistance Program.(a) Establishment.--The Veterans' Housing Assistance Program is established and shall be administered by the agency in coordination with the department.(b) Duties of department.--The department shall do all of the following:(1) Implement a program to identify homeless veterans for purposes of enrolling them in the program.(2) Coordinate with the agency to ensure that homeless veterans are provided the opportunity to receive assistance 20250HB1003PN1090 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 from the agency's housing ombudsman or financial assistance from the agency.(3) Establish guidelines to assist with the implementation of this act.(c) Duties of agency.--The agency shall do all of the following:(1) Establish a housing ombudsman or contract with a nonprofit organization to provide housing location, relocation and stabilization services to homeless veterans, including negotiating lease agreements with public agencies or private landlords on behalf of a homeless veteran.(2) Provide or contract with a third party to provide credit counseling services to homeless veterans to resolve personal credit issues that may have resulted in a negative credit report.(3) Award financial assistance to eligible homeless veterans determined to be in need of financial assistance to obtain housing.(4) Establish guidelines to assist with the implementation of this act.Section 4. Enrollment.(a) Procedure.--A veteran may enroll in the program by filing an application with the department or the agency. A veteran shall be eligible for enrollment if the veteran:(1) is homeless or at imminent risk of becoming homeless as defined in departmental guidelines established under section 3(b); and(2) cannot obtain adequate housing without the assistance of the department and the agency.(b) Conditions.--The department may require an eligible 20250HB1003PN1090 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 veteran to engage in or complete any of the following activities as a condition of acceptance into the program:(1) Mental health counseling, including treatment and recovery support.(2) Substance abuse treatment and recovery support, including counseling, treatment planning, recovery coaching and relapse prevention.(3) Integrated, coordinated treatment for co-occurring disorders.(4) Health education, including referrals for medical and dental care.(5) Services or activities designed to promote self-sufficiency, including:(i) Job training.(ii) Assistance in seeking employment.(iii) Job placement services, including job readiness, literacy and skills training.(iv) Credit counseling services and remediation.(v) Benefits advocacy.(vi) Money management.(vii) Parental skills and family support programs.(viii) Other self-help programs deemed necessary by the department.Section 5. Financial assistance.(a) Rental voucher.--The agency may award financial assistance under section 3(c) to a veteran deemed to be in need of the assistance based on the veteran's personal finances. Financial assistance shall be awarded to an eligible veteran in the form of a housing rental voucher payable to the lessor named in a leasing document executed between the veteran and a 20250HB1003PN1090 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 landlord.(b) Amount.--The monthly amount of the rental voucher may not exceed the costs associated with the rental or $1,000, whichever is less.(c) Term.--Financial assistance shall be awarded to a veteran for the term of the lease executed between the veteran and the lessor or for 12 months from the effective date of the lease, whichever is less.Section 6. Renewal.A veteran receiving financial assistance under section 5 may seek an extension of the term of the financial assistance by filing an application with the department. In determining whether to extend the term of the financial assistance, the department shall consider the following concerning the veteran:(1) Employment status.(2) Personal finances.(3) Compliance with conditions of enrollment placed on the veteran under section 4(b).Section 7. Cooperation.The department and the agency may cooperate with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or local public housing authorities to carry out the provisions of this act. At the discretion of the department and the agency, the cooperation may include coordinating the program with an existing Federal program that provides funding for housing for homeless veterans, including the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development-Veterans Affairs Supportive Housing Program.Section 8. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1003PN1090 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829